Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.090

Prior agreements.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to annul or modify, or to preclude the renewal or continuation of, any lawful agreement heretofore entered into between any college district and any representative of its employees.

[ 1991 c 238 s 153; 1971 ex.s. c 196 s 8.]